sv: Certifiering för baseboll- och softbolligan: Godkänd av Little League; Godkänd av MLB; Godkänd av NCAA; Godkänd av NFHS; Ej certifierad; Professionell kvalitet (ospecificerad); Godkänd av Senior League; Godkänd av USA Softball/ASA; Godkänd av USSSA; Godkänd av Youth League; Övrigt
sl-SI: Certifikat lige za baseball in softball: Odobreno s strani Little League; Odobreno s strani MLB; Odobreno s strani NCAA; Odobreno s strani NFHS; Ni certificirano; Profesionalna raven (neopredeljeno); Odobreno s strani Senior League; Odobreno s strani USA Softball/ASA; Odobreno s strani USSSA; Odobreno s strani Youth League; Drugo
ru: Сертификация бейсбольных и софтбольных лиг: Одобрено Little League; Одобрено MLB; Одобрено NCAA; Одобрено NFHS; Не сертифицировано; Профессиональный уровень (без спецификации); Одобрено Senior League; Одобрено USA Softball/ASA; Одобрено USSSA; Одобрено Youth League; Другое
es: Certificación de ligas de béisbol y sóftbol: Aprobado por Little League; Aprobado por la MLB; Aprobado por la NCAA; Aprobado por la NFHS; No certificado; Grado profesional (no especificado); Aprobado por Senior League; Aprobado por USA Softball/ASA; Aprobado por la USSSA; Aprobado por liga juvenil; Otro
bg-BG: Сертификация за бейзболна и софтболна лига: Одобрено за Little League; Одобрено за MLB; Одобрено за NCAA; Одобрено за NFHS; Без сертификат; Професионален клас (неуточнен); Одобрено за Senior League; Одобрено за USA Softball/ASA; Одобрено за USSSA; Одобрено за Youth League; Друго
pl: Certyfikacja ligi baseballowej/softballowej: Zatwierdzony przez Little League; Zatwierdzony przez MLB; Zatwierdzony przez NCAA; Zatwierdzony przez NFHS; Brak certyfikatu; Klasa profesjonalna (nieokreślona); Zatwierdzony przez Senior League; Zatwierdzony przez USA Softball/ASA; Zatwierdzony przez USSSA; Zatwierdzony przez Youth League; Inne
pt-BR: Certificação para ligas de beisebol e softebol: Aprovado pela Little League; Aprovado pela MLB; Aprovado pela NCAA; Aprovado pela NFHS; Não certificado; Qualidade profissional (não especificada); Aprovado pela Senior League; Aprovado pela USA Softball/ASA; Aprovado pela USSSA; Aprovado pela Youth League; Outros
tr: Beyzbol/softbol lig sertifikasyonu: Küçükler Ligi onaylı; MLB onaylı; NCAA onaylı; NFHS onaylı; Sertifikasız; Profesyonel sınıf (belirtilmemiş); Büyükler Ligi onaylı; ABD Softbol/ASA onaylı; USSSA onaylı; Gençler Ligi onaylı; Diğer
lt-LT: Beisbolo ir softbolo lygos sertifikavimas: Patvirtinta „Little League“; Patvirtinta MLB; Patvirtinta NCAA; Patvirtinta NFHS; Nesertifikuota; Profesionalų lygio (nenurodyta); Patvirtinta „Senior League“; Patvirtinta „USA Softball“ / ASA; Patvirtinta USSSA; Patvirtinta „Youth League“; Kita
zh-TW: 棒壘球聯盟認證: 通過世界少棒聯盟核准 (Little League); 通過 MLB 認證; 通過 NCAA 認證; 通過 NFHS 認證; 未認證; 專業級 (未指定); 通過高級青少棒聯盟核准 (Senior League); 通過美國壘球協會 (USA Softball)/ASA 認證; 通過 USSSA 認證; 通過青年聯盟核准; 其他
hu: Baseball- és softball-liga minősítés: Little League által jóváhagyott; MLB által jóváhagyott; NCAA által jóváhagyott; NFHS által jóváhagyott; Nem tanúsított; Professzionális szintű (nem meghatározott); Senior League által jóváhagyott; USA Softball/ASA által jóváhagyott; USSSA által jóváhagyott; Youth League által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
en: Baseball & softball league certification: Little League approved; MLB approved; NCAA approved; NFHS approved; Not certified; Professional grade (unspecified); Senior League approved; USA Softball/ASA approved; USSSA approved; Youth League approved; Other
ko: 야구 및 소프트볼 리그 인증: 리틀 야구 승인; MLB 승인; NCAA 승인; NFHS 승인; 인증되지 않음; 전문가용(미지정); 시니어 야구 승인; USA 소프트볼/ASA 승인; USSSA 승인; 유소년 야구 승인; 기타
hr-HR: Certifikacija bejzbolske i softbolske lige: Odobreno za Little League; Odobreno za MLB; Odobreno za NCAA; Odobreno za NFHS; Nije certificirano; Profesionalna razina (nije navedeno); Odobreno za Senior League; Odobreno za USA Softball/ASA; Odobreno za USSSA; Odobreno za omladinsku ligu; Ostalo
ja: 野球＆ソフトボールリーグ認定: リトルリーグ公認; MLB公認; NCAA公認; NFHS公認; 非公認; プロ仕様 (詳細なし); シニアリーグ公認; USAソフトボール/ASA公認; USSSA公認; ユースリーグ公認; その他
vi: Chứng nhận giải đấu bóng chày & bóng mềm: Được Little League chứng nhận; Được MLB chứng nhận; Được NCAA chứng nhận; Được NFHS chứng nhận; Không được chứng nhận; Cấp độ chuyên nghiệp (không xác định); Được Senior League chứng nhận; Được USA Softball/ASA chứng nhận; Được USSSA chứng nhận; Được Youth League chứng nhận; Khác
sk-SK: Certifikácia baseballovej a softbalovej ligy: Schválené Little League; Schválené MLB; Schválené NCAA; Schválené NFHS; Necertifikované; Profesionálna úroveň (nešpecifikované); Schválené pre Senior League; Schválené USA Softball/ASA; Schválené USSSA; Schválené pre mládežnícku ligu; Iná
th: การรับรองลีกเบสบอลและซอฟต์บอล: ได้รับอนุมัติจากลิตเติลลีก; ได้รับอนุมัติจาก MLB; ได้รับอนุมัติจาก NCAA; ได้รับอนุมัติจาก NFHS; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; เกรดมืออาชีพ (ไม่ระบุ); ได้รับอนุมัติจากซีเนียร์ลีก; ได้รับอนุมัติจาก USA Softball/ASA; ได้รับอนุมัติจาก USSSA; ได้รับอนุมัติจากลีกเยาวชน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Certificare pentru liga de baseball și softball: Aprobată de Little League; Aprobată de MLB; Aprobată de NCAA; Aprobată de NFHS; Necertificat; Calitate profesională (nespecificat); Aprobată de Senior League; Aprobată de USA Softball/ASA; Aprobată de USSSA; Aprobată de Youth League; Altele
pt-PT: Certificação para ligas de basebol e softebol: Aprovado pela Little League; Aprovado pela MLB; Aprovado pela NCAA; Aprovado pela NFHS; Não certificado; Uso profissional (não especificado); Aprovado pela Senior League; Aprovado pela USA Softball/ASA; Aprovado pela USSSA; Aprovado pela Youth League; Outro
zh-CN: 棒球与垒球联盟认证: Little League 认证; MLB 认证; NCAA 认证; NFHS 认证; 未认证; 专业级（未指定）; 高级联盟认证; USA Softball/ASA 认证; USSSA 认证; 青少年联盟认证; 其他
de: Baseball- und Softball-Liga-Zertifizierung: Zugelassen für Little League; MLB-zertifiziert; NCAA-zertifiziert; NFHS-zertifiziert; Nicht zertifiziert; Profi-Qualität (nicht spezifiziert); Senior League-zertifiziert; USA Softball/ASA-zertifiziert; USSSA-zertifiziert; Jugendliga-zertifiziert; Sonstige
fr: Certification des ligues de baseball et de softball: Approuvé par la Little League; Approuvé par la MLB; Approuvé par la NCAA; Approuvé par la NFHS; Non certifié; Qualité professionnelle (non spécifiée); Approuvé par la Senior League; Approuvé par la USA Softball/ASA; Approuvé par l’USSSA; Approuvé par la Youth League; Autre
nb: Sertifisering for baseball- og softballliga: Little League-godkjent; MLB-godkjent; NCAA-godkjent; NFHS-godkjent; Ikke sertifisert; Profesjonell grad (uspesifisert); Senior League-godkjent; USA Softball/ASA-godkjent; USSSA-godkjent; Youth League-godkjent; Annet
fi: Baseball- ja softball-liigan sertifiointi: Little League -hyväksytty; MLB-hyväksytty; NCAA-hyväksytty; NFHS-hyväksytty; Ei sertifioitu; Ammattilaistaso (määrittelemätön); Senior League -hyväksytty; USA Softball / ASA -hyväksytty; USSSA-hyväksytty; Youth League -hyväksytty; Muu
da: Godkendelse til baseball- og softball-ligaer: Godkendt til Little League; Godkendt til MLB; Godkendt til NCAA; Godkendt til NFHS; Ikke certificeret; Professionel kvalitet (uspecificeret); Godkendt til Senior League; Godkendt til USA Softball/ASA; Godkendt til USSSA; Godkendt til Youth League; Andet
it: Certificazione per leghe di baseball e softball: Approvato Little League; Approvato MLB; Approvato NCAA; Approvato NFHS; Non certificato; Uso professionale (non specificato); Approvato Senior League; Approvato USA Softball/ASA; Approvato USSSA; Approvato Youth League; Altro
nl: Baseball- en softbalcompetitie certificering: Goedgekeurd door Little League; Goedgekeurd door MLB; Goedgekeurd door NCAA; Goedgekeurd door NFHS; Niet gecertificeerd; Professionele kwaliteit (ongespecificeerd); Goedgekeurd door Senior League; Goedgekeurd door USA Softball/ASA; Goedgekeurd door USSSA; Goedgekeurd door Youth League; Overig
cs: Certifikace baseballové a softballové ligy: Schváleno pro Little League; Schváleno pro MLB; Schváleno pro NCAA; Schváleno pro NFHS; Bez certifikace; Profesionální kvalita (nespecifikováno); Schváleno pro Senior League; Schváleno pro USA Softball / ASA; Schváleno pro USSSA; Schváleno pro Youth League; Jiné
el: Πιστοποίηση πρωταθλήματος μπέιζμπολ και σόφτμπολ: Εγκεκριμένο για Little League; Εγκεκριμένο από το MLB; Εγκεκριμένο από το NCAA; Εγκεκριμένο από το NFHS; Μη πιστοποιημένο; Επαγγελματικού επιπέδου (μη καθορισμένο); Εγκεκριμένο για Senior League; Εγκεκριμένο από το USA Softball/ASA; Εγκεκριμένο από το USSSA; Εγκεκριμένο για Youth League; Άλλο